Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.071

Determination of permanent total disability.

(1) Benefits for permanent total disability shall be determined under the director's supervision, only after the injured victim's condition becomes fixed.

(2) All determinations of permanent total disabilities shall be made by the department. The victim may make a request or the inquiry may be initiated by the director. Determinations shall be required in every instance where permanent total disability is likely to be present.

(3) A request for determination of permanent total disability shall be examined by the department, and the department shall issue an order in accordance with RCW 51.52.050.

[ 2011 c 346 s 403.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.